New Jersey, session 222, S307.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the New Jersey Turnpike Authority shall establish and maintain a program for the waiver of electronic toll collection fees for qualified disabled veteran owned businesses.  Upon application to the authority, the program shall provide an exemption from all electronic toll collection system fees imposed by the authority for all motor vehicles that: (1)  are owned, leased, or financed by a disabled veteran; (2)  are used for a disabled veteran owned businesses that has at least $2,500 in revenues, is certified in the State, and does business in the State; (3)  are registered in the State of New Jersey; and (4)  have an active New Jersey electronic toll collection system account for the motor vehicle. b. For the purposes of this section: Disabled veteran means a resident of this State who is certified by the federal Department of Veterans Affairs as having a service-connected disability rating of at least ten percent. Disabled veteran owned business means a business which has its principal place of business in the State, is independently owned and operated and at least 51% of which is owned and controlled by persons who are disabled veterans. 2.    a.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the South Jersey Transportation Authority shall establish and maintain a program for the waiver of electronic toll collection fees for qualified disabled veteran owned businesses.  Upon application to the authority, the program shall provide an exemption from all electronic toll collection system fees imposed by the authority for all motor vehicles that: (1)  are owned, leased, or financed by a disabled veteran; (2)  are used for a disabled veteran owned businesses that has at least $2,500 in revenues, is certified in the State, and does business in the State; (3)  are registered in the State of New Jersey; and (4)  have an active New Jersey electronic toll collection system account for the motor vehicle. b. For the purposes of this section: Disabled veteran means a resident of this State who is certified by the federal Department of Veterans Affairs as having a service-connected disability rating of at least ten percent. Disabled veteran owned business means a business which has its principal place of business in the State, is independently owned and operated and at least 51% of which is owned and controlled by persons who are disabled veterans. 3.    This act shall take effect 90 days following the date of enactment.